Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 80. Salmon Price Reports.

Administrative Code. —

For salmon prices, see 15 AAC 80.

Sec. 43.80.010.
[Renumbered as AS 43.99.010.]

Sec. 43.80.015.
[Renumbered as AS 43.98.015.]

Sec. 43.80.020.
Prosecution for failure to secure license. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 43.05.290(h).]

Sec. 43.80.030.
Production of license. [Repealed, § 45 ch 113 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.80.035.
Reporting of salmon prices. [Repealed, § 2 ch 49 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 43.80.040.
[Renumbered as AS 43.99.950.]

Sec. 43.80.050.
Reporting of wholesale salmon prices.

A fish processor engaged in the business of selling salmon products at wholesale and whose business sells more than 1,000,000 pounds of salmon products at wholesale during a calendar year shall submit to the department during the following calendar year, on a form provided by the department, reports of the prices received for and quantity of salmon products sold at wholesale by the processor or an affiliate of the processor. Not later than May 31 of each reporting year, a processor shall submit a report for the period January 1 through April 30 of the reporting year. Not later than September 30 of each reporting year, a processor shall submit a report for the period May 1 through August 31 of the reporting year. Not later than January 31 of each reporting year, a processor shall submit a report for the period September 1 through December 31 of the reporting year.

A report submitted by a processor under (a) or (c) of this section must include

the requested information for the following salmon product forms:

thermally processed salmon products;

fresh headed and gutted salmon products;

fresh fillet salmon products;

frozen headed and gutted salmon products;

frozen fillet salmon products;

salmon roe products;

the requested information regarding the total quantity of each salmon product form sold by providing the total number of

each size of container in which thermally processed salmon products were sold by the processor or its affiliate; and

pounds for each of the other salmon product forms sold by the processor or its affiliate; and

for sales to buyers that are not affiliates of the processor, the total quantity of each salmon product form sold by area of production by species, and the wholesale price received.

A sale to an affiliate of the processor may not be included in a report submitted under this section by a processor. However, the processor shall report sales by an affiliate at wholesale of salmon products that were obtained from the processor. The report must include a description of the products and the total quantity of each salmon product form sold by the affiliate by area of production by species and the wholesale prices received by the affiliate.

Information shall be reported for each size of the container in which the salmon is sold.

A person excluded from the fisheries business tax under AS

43.75.017

is exempt from the requirements of this section.

Each fish processor who submits a report under (a) of this section during a reporting year shall also submit an annual report of the quantity of salmon products produced by the processor or an affiliate of the processor between January 1 and December 31 of the reporting year. The report shall be submitted to the department not later than January 31 of the following reporting year. The report must include

a description of the products and the total quantity of each salmon product form produced by area of production by species for each of the salmon product forms listed in (b)(1) of this section; and

the requested information regarding the total quantity of each salmon product form produced by providing the total number of

each size of container in which thermally processed salmon products were produced by the processor or its affiliate; and

pounds for each of the other salmon product forms produced by the processor or its affiliate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1983; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 37 SLA 1998; am §§ 3 — 6 ch 62 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12, ch. 37, SLA 1998, which repealed this section effective July 1, 2003, was repealed by § 1, ch. 32, SLA 2003.

Sec. 43.80.055.
Wholesale price averages; Alaska salmon price report.

Based on the information provided in reports submitted under AS

43.80.050

, the department shall determine the average wholesale prices paid to fish processors and their affiliates for the sale of salmon products.

The department shall determine under this section the monthly and annual wholesale price averages for

each species of salmon for each size of the container in which thermally processed salmon products are sold;

each pound of other salmon products by area of production by species by product form.

The department shall publish the average wholesale prices paid for salmon products in a report entitled the “Alaska Salmon Price Report.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1983; am § 8 ch 37 SLA 1998; am §§ 7, 8 ch 62 SLA 2000)

Sec. 43.80.060.
Report to the legislature.

Not later than March 15 of each year, the department shall make available to the legislature a report of average wholesale prices paid for salmon products and a report of the quantity of salmon products produced during the preceding calendar year. The department shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1983; am § 85 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 9 ch 37 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 62 SLA 2000)

Sec. 43.80.065.
Confidentiality of reports.

Information in reports submitted under AS

43.80.050

, and price averages calculated by the department from the information in the reports, are public information, except that information that identifies or could be used to identify a particular fish processor is confidential.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1983)

Sec. 43.80.095.
Penalty.

The department may levy and collect a civil penalty of $50 per day on a fish processor that fails to submit a report as required under AS

43.80.050

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1983)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12, ch. 37, SLA 1998, which repealed this section effective July 1, 2003, was repealed by § 1, ch. 32, SLA 2003.

Sec. 43.80.100.
Definitions.

In AS

43.80.050

—

43.80.100

,

“affiliate of the processor” means a person that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the processor;

“area of production” means the area in which a salmon product was processed by a fish processor; in this paragraph, “area” means one of the following areas:

Southeastern and Yakutat;

Prince William Sound;

Cook Inlet;

Kodiak;

Chignik;

Aleutian Islands, Atka-Amlia Islands, and Alaska Peninsula;

Bristol Bay; or

Kuskokwim, Yukon-Northern, Norton Sound-Port Clarence, and Kotzebue;

“container” means the can, pouch, or other similar container in which the salmon is thermally processed;

“control” means

owning directly or indirectly, or having the power to vote, not less than 10 percent of any class of voting securities of a corporation; or

influencing or affecting in any substantive manner the election of a majority of the directors or trustees of a corporation;

“fish processor” means a person engaging or attempting to engage in a business for which a license is required under AS

43.75.010

—

43.75.055

;

“produce” means to process salmon into a salmon product;

“reporting year” means the calendar year after the calendar year in which a fish processor’s business sells more than 1,000,000 pounds of salmon products at wholesale;

“thermally processed” means processed by the application of heat to render the salmon free of microorganisms that are capable of reproducing in the salmon under normal nonrefrigerated conditions of storage or distribution;

“wholesale” means the first sale of a salmon product at wholesale after the fishery business tax was paid or became payable on the salmon from which the salmon product was produced;

“wholesale price” includes all receipts, whether in the form of money, credits, or other consideration, from the sale of a salmon product at wholesale, without deduction for the costs of property sold, materials used, insurance, labor, services, labeling, transportation, storage, interest, taxes, losses, or any other expense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1983; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am §§ 10, 11 ch 37 SLA 1998; am §§ 10 — 12 ch 62 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1998 and 2000 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12, ch. 37, SLA 1998, which repealed this section effective July 1, 2003, was repealed by § 1, ch. 32, SLA 2003.